Massachusetts, session 194th, H1475.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (2) of Section 32L of Chapter 140 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended in lines 6 and 8 by striking out the
words “or change in rent”.
SECTION 2. Subsection (2) of Section 32L of said Chapter 140 is hereby further
amended by inserting the following words after the existing text:- “Any change in rent that does
not apply uniformly to all manufactured home tenants of a similar class shall create a rebuttable
presumption that such change in rent is unfair. With respect to any change in rent, differences in
the year of entry into an occupancy agreement or tenancy shall render otherwise similar classes
dissimilar under this subsection. Subsection (2) shall apply retroactively.”
of 1